New Mexico, session 2026, HB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three million dollars ($3,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of western New Mexico university for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to digitize files. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233326.1